Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-427
Lottery or raffle; gross proceeds; use; restrictions.

(1) The gross proceeds of any lottery or raffle shall be used solely for lawful purposes, awarding of prizes, and allowable expenses.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, not less than sixty-five percent of the gross proceeds of any lottery or raffle shall be used for the awarding of prizes, and not more than ten percent of the gross proceeds of a lottery or raffle shall be used to pay the allowable expenses of operating such scheme, except that if prizes are donated to the licensed organization to be awarded in connection with a raffle, the prizes awarded shall have a fair market value equal to at least sixty-five percent of the gross proceeds of the raffle and the licensed organization shall use the proceeds for allowable expenses, optional additional prizes, and a lawful purpose.

(3) A lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to section 9-426.02 shall only require fifty percent of the gross proceeds of such lottery or raffle to be used for awarding of prizes.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 50;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 56;

Laws 1985, LB 486, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 34;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-185;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 148;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 106;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 24.
July 1, 2026